Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-381
Mutual association; conversion; certificate of conversion; issuance; when effective.

If the department finds that a conversion proceeding has been completed in accordance with the requirements of sections 8-378 to 8-380 and any other applicable law and regulations, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate of conversion, attaching as a part of such certificate a copy of the charter, articles of incorporation, articles of association, or similar instrument. Such conversion shall not become effective until the issuance of the certificate as provided in this section.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 26.